Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 3
REGISTERED AGENTS, SERVICE
OF PROCESS, AND ANNUAL REPORTS

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1990, and this part 3 was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 2003, effective July 1, 2004, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this part 3 prior to 2004, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.

7-80-301. Limited liability companies - registered agents - service of process - periodic reports.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to limited liability companies formed under this article. Part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports, applies to limited liability companies formed under this article.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2267, § 183, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1995, § 9, effective August 11.